test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vwwidag_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vȭidag: # Noun 117 'eng /est või/fin' - full paradigm
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Nom: vȭidag
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Gen: vȭidag
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Par: vȭita
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Dat: vȭidagõn
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Ins: vȭidagõks
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Ill: vȭidagõ
     vȭidag+N+Sg+Ela: vȭidagõst
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Nom: vȭidagõd
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Gen: vȭidagõd
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Par: vȭidagidi
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Dat: vȭidagõdõn
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Ins: vȭidagõdõks
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Ill: vȭidagiž
     vȭidag+N+Pl+Ela: vȭidagist
